Illinois, session 104th, HB5070.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 7.2, 10, 13, 13.3, 17.5, 22.4, and 22.40 as 6follows: 7    (415 ILCS 5/7.2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1007.2)8    Sec. 7.2. Identical in substance rulemakings. 9    (a) In the context of a mandate that the Board adopt 10regulations to secure federal authorization for a program, 11regulations that are "identical in substance" means State 12regulations which require the same actions with respect to 13protection of the environment, by the same group of affected 14persons, as would federal regulations if USEPA administered 15the subject program in Illinois, except as provided in this 16Section. After consideration of comments from the USEPA, the 17Agency, the Attorney General and the public, the Board shall 18adopt the verbatim text of such USEPA regulations as are 19necessary and appropriate for authorization of the program. In 20adopting "identical in substance" regulations, the only 21changes that may be made by the Board to the federal 22regulations are those changes that are necessary for 23compliance with the Illinois Administrative Code, and   HB5070 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1technical changes that in no way change the scope or meaning of 2any portion of the regulations, except as follows: 3        (1) The Board shall not adopt the equivalent of USEPA 4    rules that are not applicable to persons or facilities in 5    Illinois, that govern the program authorization process, 6    that are appropriate only in USEPA-administered programs, 7    or that govern actions to be taken by USEPA, other federal 8    agencies or other states. 9        (2) The Board shall not adopt rules prescribing things 10    which are outside the Board's normal functions, such as 11    rules specifying staffing or funding requirements for 12    programs. 13        (3) If a USEPA rule prescribes the contents of a State 14    regulation without setting forth the regulation itself, 15    which would be an integral part of any regulation required 16    to be adopted as an "identical in substance" regulation as 17    defined in this Section, the Board shall adopt a 18    regulation as prescribed, to the extent possible 19    consistent with other relevant USEPA regulations and 20    existing State law. The Board may not use this subsection 21    to adopt any regulation which is a required rule as that 22    term is defined by Section 28.2 of this Act. To the extent 23    practicable, the Board in its proposed and adopted opinion 24    shall include its rationale for adopting such regulation. 25        (4) Pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 5-75 of the 26    Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, the Board may   HB5070 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1    incorporate USEPA rules by reference where it is possible 2    to do so without causing confusion to the affected public. 3        (5) If USEPA intends to retain decision-making 4    authority for a portion of the program, the Board 5    regulation shall so specify. In addition, the Board 6    regulation shall specify whether a decision is to be made 7    by the Board, the Agency or some other State agency, based 8    upon the general division of functions within this Act and 9    other Illinois statutes. 10        (6) Wherever appropriate, the Board regulations shall 11    reflect any consistent, more stringent regulations adopted 12    pursuant to the rulemaking requirements of Title VII of 13    this Act and Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative 14    Procedure Act. 15        (7) The Board may correct apparent typographical and 16    grammatical errors in USEPA rules.17        (8) The Board, in adopting "identical in substance" 18    regulations, shall not adopt USEPA rules imposing 19    standards that are less stringent than those in existing 20    Board regulations. The Board may adopt such rules pursuant 21    to the rulemaking requirements of Title VII of this Act 22    and Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 23    Act. For purposes of adopting "identical in substance" 24    regulations, a revision to a federal regulation shall be 25    considered "less stringent" than an existing Board 26    regulation only if the federal revision, when compared on   HB5070 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1    a provision-by-provision basis to the specific Board 2    regulatory requirement it would affect, directly and 3    substantively reduces the level of environmental or public 4    health protection required by the corresponding Board 5    provision, as demonstrated by one or more of the 6    following:7            (A) the federal revision eliminates a numerical 8        emission, discharge, or concentration limit, or 9        increases it above the level established in the 10        existing Board regulation;11            (B) the federal revision eliminates or narrows the 12        scope of a specific prohibition or restriction on an 13        activity, substance, or process that is expressly set 14        forth in the existing Board regulation; or15            (C) the federal revision eliminates or weakens a 16        specific, identified performance standard, design 17        standard, or technology-based requirement that is set 18        forth in the existing Board regulation. 19    (b) In adopting regulations that are "identical in 20substance" with specified federal regulations under subsection 21(c) of Section 13, Section 13.3, Section 17.5, subsection (a) 22or (d) of Section 22.4, subsection (a) of Section 22.7, or 23subsection (a) of Section 22.40, subsection (H) of Section 10, 24or specified federal determinations under subsection (e) of 25Section 9.1, the Board shall complete its rulemaking 26proceedings within one year after the adoption of the   HB5070 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1corresponding federal rule. If the Board consolidates multiple 2federal rulemakings into a single Board rulemaking, the 3one-year period shall be calculated from the adoption date of 4the federal rule first adopted among those consolidated. After 5adopting an "identical in substance" rule, if the Board 6determines that an amendment is needed to that rule, the Board 7shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding to propose such 8amendment. The amendment shall be adopted within one year of 9the initiation of the Board's determination.10    Additionally, if the Board, after adopting an "identical 11in substance" rule, determines that a technical correction to 12that rule is needed, the Board may initiate an application for 13certification of correction under Section 5-85 of the Illinois 14Administrative Procedure Act.15    The one-year period may be extended by the Board for an 16additional period of time if necessary to complete the 17rulemaking proceeding. In order to extend the one-year period, 18the Board must make a finding, based upon the record in the 19rulemaking proceeding, that the one-year period is 20insufficient for completion of the rulemaking, and such 21finding shall specifically state the reasons for the 22extension. Except as otherwise provided above, the Board must 23make the finding that an extension of time is necessary prior 24to the expiration of the initial one-year period, and must 25also publish a notice of extension in the Illinois Register as 26expeditiously as practicable following its decision, stating   HB5070 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1the specific reasons for the Board's decision to extend. The 2notice of extension need not appear in the Illinois Register 3prior to the expiration of the initial one year period and 4shall specify a date certain by which the Board anticipates 5completion of the rulemaking, except that if a date certain 6cannot be specified because of a need to delay adoption 7pending occurrence of an event beyond the Board's control, the 8notice shall specify the event, explain its circumstances, and 9contain an estimate of the amount of time needed to complete 10the rulemaking after the occurrence of the specified event.11(Source: P.A. 97-945, eff. 8-10-12.) 12    (415 ILCS 5/10)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1010)13    Sec. 10. Regulations. 14    (A) The Board, pursuant to procedures prescribed in Title 15VII of this Act, may adopt regulations to promote the purposes 16of this Title. Without limiting the generality of this 17authority, such regulations may among other things prescribe: 18        (a) (Blank); 19        (b) Emission standards specifying the maximum amounts 20    or concentrations of various contaminants that may be 21    discharged into the atmosphere; 22        (c) Standards for the issuance of permits for 23    construction, installation, or operation of any equipment, 24    facility, vehicle, vessel, or aircraft capable of causing 25    or contributing to air pollution or designed to prevent   HB5070 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1    air pollution; 2        (d) Standards and conditions regarding the sale, 3    offer, or use of any fuel, vehicle, or other article 4    determined by the Board to constitute an air-pollution 5    hazard; 6        (e) Alert and abatement standards relative to 7    air-pollution episodes or emergencies constituting an 8    acute danger to health or to the environment; 9        (f) Requirements and procedures for the inspection of 10    any equipment, facility, vehicle, vessel, or aircraft that 11    may cause or contribute to air pollution; 12        (g) Requirements and standards for equipment and 13    procedures for monitoring contaminant discharges at their 14    sources, the collection of samples, and the collection, 15    reporting, and retention of data resulting from such 16    monitoring.17    (B) The Board may adopt regulations and emission standards 18that are applicable or that may become applicable to 19stationary emission sources located in all areas of the State 20in accordance with any of the following: 21        (1) that are required by federal law; 22        (2) that are otherwise part of the State's attainment 23    plan and are necessary to attain the national ambient air 24    quality standards; or 25        (3) that are necessary to comply with the requirements 26    of the federal Clean Air Act; or  HB5070 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1        (4) that are necessary to comply with air quality 2    standards adopted by the Board.3    (C) The Board may not adopt any regulation banning the 4burning of landscape waste throughout the State generally. The 5Board may, by regulation, restrict or prohibit the burning of 6landscape waste within any geographical area of the State if 7it determines based on medical and biological evidence 8generally accepted by the scientific community that such 9burning will produce in the atmosphere of that geographical 10area contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such 11characteristics and duration as to be injurious to human, 12plant, or animal life or health.13    (D) The Board shall adopt regulations requiring the owner 14or operator of a gasoline dispensing system that dispenses 15more than 10,000 gallons of gasoline per month to install and 16operate a system for the recovery of gasoline vapor emissions 17arising from the fueling of motor vehicles that meets the 18requirements of Section 182 of the federal Clean Air Act (42 19U.S.C. 7511a). These regulations shall apply only in areas of 20the State that are classified as moderate, serious, severe, or 21extreme nonattainment areas for ozone pursuant to Section 181 22of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. 7511), but shall not 23apply in such areas classified as moderate nonattainment areas 24for ozone if the Administrator of the U.S. Environmental 25Protection Agency promulgates standards for vehicle-based 26(onboard) systems for the control of vehicle refueling   HB5070 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1emissions pursuant to Section 202(a)(6) of the federal Clean 2Air Act (42 U.S.C. 7521(a)(6)) by November 15, 1992.3    (E) The Board shall not adopt or enforce any regulation 4requiring the use of a tarpaulin or other covering on a truck, 5trailer, or other vehicle that is stricter than the 6requirements of Section 15-109.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 7To the extent that it is in conflict with this subsection, the 8Board's rule codified as 35 Ill. Adm. Code 212.315 is hereby 9superseded.10    (F) Any person who, prior to June 8, 1988, has filed a 11timely Notice of Intent to Petition for an Adjusted RACT 12Emissions Limitation and who subsequently timely files a 13completed petition for an adjusted RACT emissions limitation 14pursuant to 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 215, Subpart I, shall be 15subject to the procedures contained in Subpart I but shall be 16excluded by operation of law from 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 215, 17Subparts PP, QQ, and RR, including the applicable definitions 18in 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 211. Such persons shall instead be 19subject to a separate regulation which the Board is hereby 20authorized to adopt pursuant to the adjusted RACT emissions 21limitation procedure in 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 215, Subpart I. 22In its final action on the petition, the Board shall create a 23separate rule which establishes Reasonably Available Control 24Technology (RACT) for such person. The purpose of this 25procedure is to create separate and independent regulations 26for purposes of SIP submittal, review, and approval by USEPA.  HB5070 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1    (G) Subpart FF of Subtitle B, Title 35 Ill. Adm. Code 2218.720 through 218.730 and 219.720 through 219.730, are 3hereby repealed by operation of law and are rendered null and 4void and of no force and effect.5    (H) In accordance with subsection (b) of Section 7.2, the 6Board shall adopt ambient air quality standards specifying the 7maximum permissible short-term and long-term concentrations of 8various contaminants in the atmosphere; those standards shall 9be identical in substance to the national ambient air quality 10standards promulgated by the Administrator of the United 11States Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with 12Section 109 of the Clean Air Act, except that the Board shall 13not adopt under this subsection (H) any standards less 14stringent than those existing in Board regulations. The Board 15may consolidate into a single rulemaking under this subsection 16all such federal regulations adopted within a period of time 17not to exceed 6 months. The provisions and requirements of 18Title VII of this Act and Section 5-35 of the Illinois 19Administrative Procedure Act, relating to procedures for 20rulemaking, shall not apply to identical in substance 21regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection. However, the 22Board shall provide for notice and public comment before 23adopted rules are filed with the Secretary of State. Nothing 24in this subsection shall be construed to limit the right of any 25person to submit a proposal to the Board, or the authority of 26the Board to adopt, air quality standards more stringent than   HB5070 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1the standards promulgated by the Administrator, pursuant to 2the rulemaking requirements of Title VII of this Act and 3Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 4(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 5    (415 ILCS 5/13)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1013)6    Sec. 13. Regulations. 7    (a) The Board, pursuant to procedures prescribed in Title 8VII of this Act, may adopt regulations to promote the purposes 9and provisions of this Title. Without limiting the generality 10of this authority, such regulations may among other things 11prescribe: 12        (1) Water quality standards specifying among other 13    things, the maximum short-term and long-term 14    concentrations of various contaminants in the waters, the 15    minimum permissible concentrations of dissolved oxygen and 16    other desirable matter in the waters, and the temperature 17    of such waters; 18        (2) Effluent standards specifying the maximum amounts 19    or concentrations, and the physical, chemical, thermal, 20    biological and radioactive nature of contaminants that may 21    be discharged into the waters of the State, as defined 22    herein, including, but not limited to, waters to any 23    sewage works, or into any well, or from any source within 24    the State; 25        (3) Standards for the issuance of permits for   HB5070 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1    construction, installation, or operation of any equipment, 2    facility, vessel, or aircraft capable of causing or 3    contributing to water pollution or designed to prevent 4    water pollution or for the construction or installation of 5    any sewer or sewage treatment facility or any new outlet 6    for contaminants into the waters of this State; 7        (4) The circumstances under which the operators of 8    sewage works are required to obtain and maintain 9    certification by the Agency under Section 13.5 and the 10    types of sewage works to which those requirements apply, 11    which may, without limitation, include wastewater 12    treatment works, pretreatment works, and sewers and 13    collection systems; 14        (5) Standards for the filling or sealing of abandoned 15    water wells and holes, and holes for disposal of drainage 16    in order to protect ground water against contamination; 17        (6) Standards and conditions regarding the sale, 18    offer, or use of any pesticide, detergent, or any other 19    article determined by the Board to constitute a water 20    pollution hazard, provided that any such regulations 21    relating to pesticides shall be adopted only in accordance 22    with the "Illinois Pesticide Act", approved August 14, 23    1979 as amended; 24        (7) Alert and abatement standards relative to 25    water-pollution episodes or emergencies which constitute 26    an acute danger to health or to the environment;   HB5070 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1        (8) Requirements and procedures for the inspection of 2    any equipment, facility, or vessel that may cause or 3    contribute to water pollution; 4        (9) Requirements and standards for equipment and 5    procedures for monitoring contaminant discharges at their 6    sources, the collection of samples and the collection, 7    reporting and retention of data resulting from such 8    monitoring.9    (b) Notwithstanding other provisions of this Act and for 10purposes of implementing an NPDES program, the Board shall 11adopt: 12        (1) Requirements, standards, and procedures which, 13    together with other regulations adopted pursuant to this 14    Section 13, are necessary or appropriate to enable the 15    State of Illinois to implement and participate in the 16    National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) 17    pursuant to and under the Federal Water Pollution Control 18    Act, as now or hereafter amended. All regulations adopted 19    by the Board governing the NPDES program shall be 20    consistent with and at least as stringent as the 21    applicable provisions of such federal Act and regulations 22    pursuant thereto, and otherwise shall be consistent with 23    all other provisions of this Act, and shall exclude from 24    the requirement to obtain any operating permit otherwise 25    required under this Title a facility for which an NPDES 26    permit has been issued under Section 39(b); provided,   HB5070 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1    however, that for purposes of this paragraph, a UIC 2    permit, as required under Section 12(g) and 39(d) of this 3    Act, is not an operating permit. 4        (2) Regulations for the exemption of any category or 5    categories of persons or contaminant sources from the 6    requirement to obtain any NPDES permit prescribed or from 7    any standards or conditions governing such permit when the 8    environment will be adequately protected without the 9    requirement of such permit, and such exemption is either 10    consistent with the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 11    as now or hereafter amended, or regulations pursuant 12    thereto, or is necessary to avoid an arbitrary or 13    unreasonable hardship to such category or categories of 14    persons or sources.15    (c) In accordance with Section 7.2, and notwithstanding 16any other provisions of this Act, for purposes of implementing 17a State UIC program, the Board shall adopt regulations which 18are identical in substance to federal regulations or 19amendments thereto promulgated by the Administrator of the 20United States Environmental Protection Agency in accordance 21with Section 1421 of the Safe Drinking Water Act (P.L. 2293-523), as amended, except that the Board shall not adopt 23under this subsection (c) any standards less stringent than 24those existing in Board regulations. The Board may consolidate 25into a single rulemaking under this Section all such federal 26regulations adopted within a period of time not to exceed 6   HB5070 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1months. The provisions and requirements of Title VII of this 2Act shall not apply to regulations adopted under this 3subsection. Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative 4Procedure Act relating to procedures for rulemaking shall not 5apply to regulations adopted under this subsection.6    (d) The Board may adopt regulations relating to a State 7UIC program that are not inconsistent with and are at least as 8stringent as the Safe Drinking Water Act (P.L. 93-523), as 9amended, or regulations adopted thereunder. Regulations 10adopted pursuant to this subsection shall be adopted in 11accordance with the provisions and requirements of Title VII 12of this Act and the procedures for rulemaking in Section 5-35 13of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.14(Source: P.A. 93-170, eff. 7-10-03.) 15    (415 ILCS 5/13.3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1013.3)16    Sec. 13.3. In accordance with Section 7.2, the Board shall 17adopt regulations which are identical in substance to federal 18regulations or amendments thereto promulgated by the 19Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection 20Agency to implement Sections 307(b), (c), (d), 402(b)(8) and 21402(b)(9) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as 22amended, except that the Board shall not adopt under this 23Section any standards less stringent than those existing in 24Board regulations. The Board may consolidate into a single 25rulemaking under this Section all such federal regulations   HB5070 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1adopted within a period of time not to exceed 6 months. The 2provisions and requirements of Title VII of this Act shall not 3apply to regulations adopted under this Section. Sections 5-35 4and 5-75 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act relating 5to procedures for rulemaking shall not apply to regulations 6adopted under this Section. However, the Board shall provide 7for notice and public comment before adopted rules are filed 8with the Secretary of State. 9(Source: P.A. 88-45; 89-445, eff. 2-7-96.) 10    (415 ILCS 5/17.5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1017.5)11    Sec. 17.5. In accordance with Section 7.2, the Board shall 12adopt regulations which are "identical in substance" to 13federal regulations or amendments thereto promulgated by the 14Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection 15Agency to implement Sections 1412(b), 1414(c), 1417(a), and 161445(a) of the Safe Drinking Water Act (P.L. 93-523), as 17amended, except that the Board shall not adopt under this 18Section any standards less stringent than those existing in 19Board regulations. The provisions and requirements of Title 20VII of this Act shall not apply to regulations adopted under 21this Section. Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative 22Procedure Act relating to procedures for rulemaking shall not 23apply to regulations adopted under this Section. However, the 24Board shall provide for notice and public comment before 25adopted rules are filed with the Secretary of State. The Board   HB5070 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1may consolidate into a single rulemaking under this Section 2all such federal regulations adopted within a period of time 3not to exceed 6 months.4(Source: P.A. 88-45.) 5    (415 ILCS 5/22.4)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1022.4)6    Sec. 22.4. Hazardous waste; underground storage tanks; 7regulations. 8    (a) In accordance with Section 7.2, the Board shall adopt 9regulations which are identical in substance to federal 10regulations or amendments thereto promulgated by the 11Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection 12Agency to implement Sections 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, and 3005, 13of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (P.L. 1494-580), except that the Board shall not adopt under this 15subsection (a) any standards less stringent than those 16existing in Board regulations. The Board may consolidate into 17a single rulemaking under this Section all such federal 18regulations adopted within a period of time not to exceed 6 19months. The provisions and requirements of Title VII of this 20Act shall not apply to rules adopted under this subsection. 21Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 22relating to procedures for rulemaking shall not apply to rules 23adopted under this subsection.24    (b) The Board may adopt regulations relating to a State 25hazardous waste management program that are not inconsistent   HB5070 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1with and at least as stringent as the Resource Conservation 2and Recovery Act of 1976 (P.L. 94-580), or regulations adopted 3thereunder. Regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection 4shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions and 5requirements of Title VII of this Act and the procedures for 6rulemaking in Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative 7Procedure Act.8    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, the 9Board may adopt additional regulations identifying the 10characteristics of hazardous waste and additional regulations 11listing hazardous waste. In adopting such regulations, the 12Board shall take into account the toxicity, persistence, and 13degradability in nature, the potential for accumulation in 14tissue, and other related factors such as flammability, 15corrosiveness, and other hazardous characteristics. The 16regulations may be revised from time to time as may be 17appropriate. Regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection 18shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions and 19requirements of this Act and the procedures for rulemaking in 20Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.21    (d) (1) In accordance with Section 7.2, after the adoption 22of regulations by the United States Environmental Protection 23Agency to implement Section 9003 of Subtitle I of the 24Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984 (P.L. 98-616) of 25the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (P.L. 2694-580), or any amendments to such regulations, the Board   HB5070 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1shall adopt regulations relating to corrective action at 2underground storage tanks that are identical in substance to 3such federal regulations, except that the Board shall not 4adopt under this subsection (d) any standards less stringent 5than those existing in Board regulations.6    (2) The rulemaking provisions of Title VII of this Act and 7of Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 8shall not apply to regulations or amendments adopted pursuant 9to this subsection (d).10    (3) For purposes of adopting regulations or amendments 11thereto under this subsection (d), corrective action shall not 12include requirements providing for design, construction, 13installation, general operation, release detection, release 14reporting, release determination investigation, release 15confirmation, out-of-service systems and their closure or 16financial responsibility.17    (4) By January 1, 1992, the Board shall amend its rules 18pertaining to underground storage tanks adopted under 19paragraph (1) of this subsection to make those rules 20applicable to any heating oil underground storage tank.21(Source: P.A. 87-323; 87-1088; 88-45.) 22    (415 ILCS 5/22.40)23    Sec. 22.40. Municipal solid waste landfill rules. 24    (a) In accordance with Sec. 7.2, the Board shall adopt 25rules that are identical in substance to federal regulations   HB5070 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1or amendments thereto promulgated by the Administrator of the 2United States Environmental Protection Agency to implement 3Sections 4004 and 4010 of the Resource Conservation and 4Recovery Act of 1976 (P.L. 94-580) insofar as those 5regulations relate to a municipal solid waste landfill unit 6program, except that the Board shall not under this subsection 7(a) adopt any standards less stringent than those existing in 8Board regulations. The Board may consolidate into a single 9rulemaking under this Section all such federal regulations 10adopted within a period of time not to exceed 6 months. Where 11the federal regulations authorize the State to adopt 12alternative standards, schedules, or procedures to the 13standards, schedules, or procedures contained in the federal 14regulations, the Board may adopt alternative standards, 15schedules, or procedures under subsection (b) or retain 16existing Board rules that establish alternative standards, 17schedules, or procedures that are not inconsistent with the 18federal regulations. The Board may consolidate into a single 19rulemaking under this Section all such federal regulations 20adopted within a period of time not to exceed 6 months.21    The provisions and requirements of Title VII of this Act 22shall not apply to rules adopted under this subsection (a). 23Section 5-35 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 24relating to the procedures for rulemaking shall not apply to 25regulations adopted under this subsection (a).26    (b) The Board may adopt regulations relating to a State   HB5070 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 19577 BDA 33025 b1municipal solid waste landfill program that are not 2inconsistent with the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act 3of 1976 (P.L. 94-580), or regulations adopted thereunder. 4Rules adopted under this subsection shall be adopted in 5accordance with the provisions and requirements of Title VII 6of this Act and the procedures for rulemaking in Section 5-35 7of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.8    (c) (Blank.)9(Source: P.A. 92-574, eff. 6-26-02.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.